District of Columbia statutes.
47-2023

Rules and regulations.

The Mayor may issue rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 121, ch. 146, title I, § 143
July 24, 1982, D.C. Law 4-131, § 211, 29 DCR 2418
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Cross References

Tax rates, records and surplus funds, authority of Council to change certain tax rates, see § 47-504.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2023.
1973 Ed., § 47-2620.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 12(aaa) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, October 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 12(aaa) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-228, March 23, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(zz) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(aaa) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(aaa) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).